Hawaii statutes.
§603-3 First circuit court judges.
Effective July 1, 1992, the circuit court of the first circuit shall consist of
twenty-five judges, who shall be styled as first, second, third, fourth, fifth,
sixth, seventh, eighth, ninth, tenth, eleventh, twelfth, thirteenth,
fourteenth, fifteenth, sixteenth, seventeenth, eighteenth, nineteenth,
twentieth, twenty-first, twenty-second, twenty-third, twenty-fourth, and
twenty-fifth judge, respectively. [L 1892, c 57, pt of §30; RL 1945, §9633; am
L 1945, c 142, §1; am L 1951, c 26, §1; am L 1953, c 129, §1; RL 1955, §215-3;
am L 1959, c 223, §1; am L 1965, c 216, §1 and c 232, §1; HRS §603-3; am L
1972, c 88, §3(a); am L 1978, c 177, §1; am L 1982, c 214, §1; am L 1992, c 4,
§1 and c 253, §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next